District of Columbia statutes.
42-403

Defective grants recorded on or after April 27, 1994.

Any instrument recorded in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds on or after April 27, 1994, shall be effective notwithstanding the existence of 1 or more of the failures in the formal requisites listed in § 42-404, unless the failure is challenged in a judicial proceeding commenced within 6 months after the instrument is recorded.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 499b
as added Apr. 27, 1994, D.C. Law 10-110, § 2(f), 41 DCR 1023
1981 Ed., § 45-801.2.
This section is referenced in § 42-404.